Maryland, session 2025, HB1130.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–809.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1130*

HOUSE BILL 1130
(b) (1) (vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
(g) If a person liable under this section does not pay the civil penalty or contest
the violation, the Administration may refuse to register or reregister the motor vehicle cited
for the violation.
26–305.
(a) The Administration may not register or transfer the registration of any vehicle
involved in a parking violation under this subtitle, a violation under any federal parking
regulation that applies to property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S.
government, a violation of § 21–202(h) of this article as determined under § 21–202.1 of this
article or Title 21, Subtitle 8 of this article as determined under § 21–809 or § 21–810 of
this article, or a violation of the Illegal Dumping and Litter Control Law under § 10–110 of
the Criminal Law Article or a local law or ordinance adopted by Baltimore City relating to
the unlawful disposal of litter as determined under § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article,
if:
(1) It is notified by a political subdivision or authorized State agency that
the person cited for the violation under this subtitle, § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of
this article, or § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to either:
(i) Pay the fine for the violation by the date specified in the citation;
or
(ii) File a notice of his intention to stand trial for the violation;
(2) It is notified by the District Court that a person who has elected to stand
trial for the violation under this subtitle, under § 21–202.1, § 21–809, or § 21–810 of this
article, or under § 10–110 or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article has failed to appear for
trial; or
(3) It is notified by a U.S. District Court that a person cited for a violation
under a federal parking regulation:
(i) Has failed to pay the fine for the violation by the date specified
in the federal citation; or
(ii) Either has failed to file a notice of the person’s intention to stand
trial for the violation, or, if electing to stand trial, has failed to appear for trial.

HOUSE BILL 1130 3
(b) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, the
Administration may suspend the registration of a vehicle involved in a parking violation
under this subtitle or a violation under any federal parking regulation that applies to
property in this State under the jurisdiction of the U.S. government if notified in accordance
with subsection (a) of this section that the violator is a chronic offender.
(2) The Administration may adopt rules and regulations to define chronic
offender and develop procedures to carry out the suspension of registration as authorized
by this subsection.
(B–1) (1) FOR THE PURPOSE OF IMPOSING ADMINISTRATIVE SANCTIONS
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, BALTIMORE CITY SHALL NOTIFY THE
ADMINISTRATION IF AN OWNER OR A DRIVER OF A VEHICLE HAS ACCUMULATED
MORE THAN $250 IN UNPAID AND OVERDUE CITATIONS RECORDED BY SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE CITY UNDER §
21–809(B)(1)(VI)4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(2) BALTIMORE CITY MAY IMMOBILIZE A VEHICLE OWNED OR DRIVEN
BY A PERSON THAT HAS ACCUMULATED MORE THAN $250 IN UNPAID AND OVERDUE
CITATIONS RECORDED BY SPEED MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 83 IN
BALTIMORE CITY UNDER § 21–809(B)(1)(VI)4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(3) THE FIFTH NOTICE OF A CITATION RECORDED BY SPEED
MONITORING SYSTEMS ON INTERSTATE 83 IN BALTIMORE CITY UNDER §
21–809(B)(1)(VI)4 OF THIS ARTICLE SENT TO THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF A VEHICLE
SHALL INCLUDE A WARNING THAT THE REGISTRATION OF A VEHICLE THAT
ACCUMULATES MORE THAN $250 IN UNPAID AND OVERDUE CITATIONS MAY BE
SUBJECT TO THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS:
(I) FOR THE CURRENT OWNER, THE REGISTRATION OF THE
VEHICLE MAY BE SUSPENDED AND THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REFUSE TO RENEW
THE VEHICLE’S REGISTRATION; AND
(II) ON THE SALE OF THE VEHICLE, THE NEW OWNER MAY BE
RESPONSIBLE FOR THE PAYMENT OF UNPAID AND OVERDUE CITATIONS BEFORE
THE ADMINISTRATION REGISTERS THE VEHICLE.
(c) The Administration shall continue the suspension and refusal to register or
transfer a registration of the vehicle until:
(1) If the suspension or refusal was required under subsection (a)(1) or
(b)(1) of this section, the political subdivision or State agency notifies the Administration
that the charge has been satisfied;

HOUSE BILL 1130
(2) If the suspension or refusal was required under subsection (a)(2) or
(b)(1) of this section, the District Court notifies the Administration that the person cited
has appeared for trial or has pleaded guilty and paid the fine for the violation; or
(3) If the suspension or refusal was required under subsection (a)(3) or
(b)(1) of this section, the U.S. District Court notifies the Administration that the charge has
been satisfied.
(d) If the registration of the vehicle has been suspended in accordance with
subsection (b)(1) of this section, a person may not drive the vehicle on any highway in this
State.
(e) The procedures specified in this section are in addition to any other penalty
provided by law for the failure to pay a fine or stand trial for a parking violation.
(f) The Administration shall adopt procedures by which the political
subdivisions, State agencies, the District Court, and the U.S. District Court shall notify it
of any restrictions and any rescission of restrictions placed on the registration of vehicles
under this section.
(g) (1) In addition to any other fee or penalty provided by law, an owner of a
vehicle who is denied registration of the vehicle under the provisions of this section shall
pay a fee established by the Administration before renewal of the registration of the vehicle.
(2) The fee described under paragraph (1) of this subsection:
(i) May be distributed in part to a political subdivision acting as an
agent of the Administration in the registration of a vehicle under § 13–404 of this article if,
based upon information provided to the Administration by the political subdivision under
this section, the vehicle’s prior registration was suspended or the vehicle’s registration
renewal was denied; and
(ii) Except as provided under item (i) of this paragraph, shall be
retained by the Administration and may not be credited to the Gasoline and Motor Vehicle
Revenue Account for distribution under § 8–403 or § 8–404 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.